Wyoming statutes. Title 13 Banks, Banking and Finance
Article 2. Interest and Dividends

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

11 Am. Jur. 2d Banks § 1003.

§ 13-7-201.
“Member” defined.

A member of a state savings and loan association is any person owning a savings account or investment certificate or any person borrowing from or assuming a loan held by an association or obligated upon a loan held by an association through purchase. Savings and investment account holders have no vote in the operations of the association.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 141, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 13-279.01; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1993, ch. 115, § 1.

§ 13-7-202.
Interest and earnings.

Interest receivable on all loans shall be accrued monthly and an interest due and accrued account shall be maintained equivalent to all accrued and uncollected interest. By each closing date, after payment or provision for all expenses and appropriate transfers to reserves, the remainder of net earnings for the period shall be credited to the undivided profits account or to an unallocated reserve account.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 172, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 13-279.1; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1.

§ 13-7-203.
Dividends.

Guaranty capital stock is not entitled to any dividend until all expenses and losses have been paid and reserves have been provided as required by law and all interest has been paid on all savings and investment accounts.

Following compliance with subsection (a) of this section all liabilities, earnings and undivided profits are available for dividends on the guaranty capital stock. In liquidation, after payment of all liabilities and savings and investment account holders at par with interest, any excess shall be paid to the guaranty capital stockholders pro rata.

History.

Laws 1959, ch. 172, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 13-279.1; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1.